Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/TechTerms.aff
FLAG num
SFX 425 N 1
SFX 425 0 ChannelListener .

SFX 426 N 1
SFX 426 0 Channels .

SFX 427 N 1
SFX 427 0 ChannelSubscribers .

SFX 428 N 1
SFX 428 0 character .

SFX 429 N 1
SFX 429 0 Character .

SFX 430 N 1
SFX 430 0 CharacterEncoding .

SFX 431 N 1
SFX 431 0 Characteristic .

SFX 432 N 1
SFX 432 0 CharacteristicA .

SFX 433 N 1
SFX 433 0 CharacteristicB .

SFX 434 N 1
SFX 434 0 CharacteristicExponent .

SFX 435 N 1
SFX 435 0 CharacterRound .

SFX 436 N 1
SFX 436 0 CharacterRounding .

SFX 437 N 1
SFX 437 0 Chart .

SFX 438 N 1
SFX 438 0 Chart3D .

SFX 439 N 1
SFX 439 0 Check .

SFX 440 N 1
SFX 440 0 CheckUpdate .

SFX 441 N 1
SFX 441 0 chen .

SFX 442 N 1
SFX 442 0 ChiSquareDistribution .

SFX 443 N 1
SFX 443 0 Choice .

SFX 444 N 1
SFX 444 0 choose .

SFX 445 N 1
SFX 445 0 chordal .

SFX 446 N 1
SFX 446 0 Chromatic .

SFX 447 N 1
SFX 447 0 CI .

SFX 448 N 1
SFX 448 0 circle .

SFX 449 N 1
SFX 449 0 Circle .

SFX 450 N 1
SFX 450 0 circles .

SFX 451 N 1
SFX 451 0 CITable .

SFX 452 N 1
SFX 452 0 City .

SFX 453 N 1
SFX 453 0 CivitaTensor .

SFX 454 N 1
SFX 454 0 Class .

SFX 455 N 1
SFX 455 0 Classification .

SFX 456 N 1
SFX 456 0 ClassificationObject .

SFX 457 N 1
SFX 457 0 ClassList .

SFX 458 N 1
SFX 458 0 clicked .

SFX 459 N 1
SFX 459 0 ClipboardType .

SFX 460 N 1
SFX 460 0 Clique .

SFX 461 N 1
SFX 461 0 ClosedCellArea .

SFX 462 N 1
SFX 462 0 Cloud .

SFX 463 N 1
SFX 463 0 CloudDirectory .

SFX 464 N 1
SFX 464 0 ClusterData .

SFX 465 N 1
SFX 465 0 ClusteringCoefficient .

SFX 466 N 1
SFX 466 0 Clusters .

SFX 467 N 1
SFX 467 0 CN .

SFX 468 N 1
SFX 468 0 Code .

SFX 469 N 1
SFX 469 0 CodeAssist .

SFX 470 N 1
SFX 470 0 Coefficient .

SFX 471 N 1
SFX 471 0 Coefficients .

SFX 472 N 1
SFX 472 0 CollisionFunction .

SFX 473 N 1
SFX 473 0 color .

SFX 474 N 1
SFX 474 0 Color .

SFX 475 N 1
SFX 475 0 ColorDistance .

SFX 476 N 1
SFX 476 0 coloring .

SFX 477 N 1
SFX 477 0 Colors .

SFX 478 N 1
SFX 478 0 Column .

SFX 479 N 1
SFX 479 0 Columns .

SFX 480 N 1
SFX 480 0 Comb .

SFX 481 N 1
SFX 481 0 CommandKey .

SFX 482 N 1
SFX 482 0 CommonSequence .

SFX 483 N 1
SFX 483 0 CommonSequencePositions .

SFX 484 N 1
SFX 484 0 CommonSubsequence .

SFX 485 N 1
SFX 485 0 CommonSubsequencePositions .

SFX 486 N 1
SFX 486 0 Complement .

SFX 487 N 1
SFX 487 0 Complete .

SFX 488 N 1
SFX 488 0 Complex .

SFX 489 N 1
SFX 489 0 ComponentInstances .

SFX 490 N 1
SFX 490 0 Components .

SFX 491 N 1
SFX 491 0 Compose .

SFX 492 N 1
SFX 492 0 Composition .

SFX 493 N 1
SFX 493 0 Condition .

SFX 494 N 1
SFX 494 0 ConditionGraph .

SFX 495 N 1
SFX 495 0 condun .

SFX 496 N 1
SFX 496 0 conduns .

SFX 497 N 1
SFX 497 0 ConfidenceRegion .

SFX 498 N 1
SFX 498 0 Confirm .

SFX 499 N 1
SFX 499 0 Congruent .

SFX 500 N 1
SFX 500 0 conic .

SFX 501 N 1
SFX 501 0 Connect .

SFX 502 N 1
SFX 502 0 Connection .

SFX 503 N 1
SFX 503 0 ConnectionObject .

SFX 504 N 1
SFX 504 0 Constant .

SFX 505 N 1
SFX 505 0 ConstantReduced .

SFX 506 N 1
SFX 506 0 Constants .

SFX 507 N 1
SFX 507 0 Constrained .

SFX 508 N 1
SFX 508 0 Constraint .

SFX 509 N 1
SFX 509 0 Construct .

SFX 510 N 1
SFX 510 0 contagon .

SFX 511 N 1
SFX 511 0 ContainsQ .

SFX 512 N 1
SFX 512 0 Contents .

SFX 513 N 1
SFX 513 0 Context .

SFX 514 N 1
SFX 514 0 Contexts .

SFX 515 N 1
SFX 515 0 ContinguousIncreasingSubsequence .

SFX 516 N 1
SFX 516 0 continuous .

SFX 517 N 1
SFX 517 0 ContinuousWaveletTransform .

SFX 518 N 1
SFX 518 0 Control .

SFX 519 N 1
SFX 519 0 ControllabilityMatrix .

SFX 520 N 1
SFX 520 0 ControllableModelQ .

SFX 521 N 1
SFX 521 0 ControlPlacement .

SFX 522 N 1
SFX 522 0 Controls .

SFX 523 N 1
SFX 523 0 Convergence .

SFX 524 N 1
SFX 524 0 Conversion .

SFX 525 N 1
SFX 525 0 Convert .

SFX 526 N 1
SFX 526 0 ConvertToPostScriptPacket .

SFX 527 N 1
SFX 527 0 Convolve .

SFX 528 N 1
SFX 528 0 Cookies .

SFX 529 N 1
SFX 529 0 CoordinateFunction .

SFX 530 N 1
SFX 530 0 Coordinates .

SFX 531 N 1
SFX 531 0 CoordinateScaling .

SFX 532 N 1
SFX 532 0 Copies .

SFX 533 N 1
SFX 533 0 CopyFile .

SFX 534 N 1
SFX 534 0 corn .

SFX 535 N 1
SFX 535 0 Correct .

SFX 536 N 1
SFX 536 0 CosCoefficient .

SFX 537 N 1
SFX 537 0 CosetRepresentative .

SFX 538 N 1
SFX 538 0 cosichoron .

SFX 539 N 1
SFX 539 0 CosSeries .

SFX 540 N 1
SFX 540 0 CosSeriesCoefficient .

SFX 541 N 1
SFX 541 0 CosTransform .

SFX 542 N 1
SFX 542 0 CotesError .

SFX 543 N 1
SFX 543 0 CotesWeights .

SFX 544 N 1
SFX 544 0 coulomb .

SFX 545 N 1
SFX 545 0 coulombs .

SFX 546 N 1
SFX 546 0 Count .

SFX 547 N 1
SFX 547 0 CountConvention .

SFX 548 N 1
SFX 548 0 CounterAssignments .

SFX 549 N 1
SFX 549 0 CounterIncrements .

SFX 550 N 1
SFX 550 0 Country .

SFX 551 N 1
SFX 551 0 Counts .

SFX 552 N 1
SFX 552 0 CPrime .

SFX 553 N 1
SFX 553 0 CreationSettings .

SFX 554 N 1
SFX 554 0 cronic .

SFX 555 N 1
SFX 555 0 cross .

SFX 556 N 1
SFX 556 0 cs .

SFX 557 N 1
SFX 557 0 CS .

SFX 558 N 1
SFX 558 0 CupCap .

SFX 559 N 1
SFX 559 0 curie .

SFX 560 N 1
SFX 560 0 curies .

SFX 561 N 1
SFX 561 0 CursorTracker .

SFX 562 N 1
SFX 562 0 CurvatureTable .

SFX 563 N 1
SFX 563 0 Curve .

SFX 564 N 1
SFX 564 0 CurveData .

SFX 565 N 1
SFX 565 0 CurvePath .

SFX 566 N 1
SFX 566 0 CutVertex .

SFX 567 N 1
SFX 567 0 Cycle .

SFX 568 N 1
SFX 568 0 Cycles .

SFX 569 N 1
SFX 569 0 CylindricalDecomposition .

SFX 570 N 1
SFX 570 0 d .

SFX 571 N 1
SFX 571 0 D .

SFX 572 N 1
SFX 572 0 da .

SFX 573 N 1
SFX 573 0 dalton .

SFX 574 N 1
SFX 574 0 daltons .

SFX 575 N 1
SFX 575 0 Dark .

SFX 576 N 1
SFX 576 0 das .

SFX 577 N 1
SFX 577 0 Dashed .

SFX 578 N 1
SFX 578 0 Data .

SFX 579 N 1
SFX 579 0 DataGrid .

SFX 580 N 1
SFX 580 0 DataMethod .

SFX 581 N 1
SFX 581 0 DataRules .

SFX 582 N 1
SFX 582 0 Date .

SFX 583 N 1
SFX 583 0 DayName .

SFX 584 N 1
SFX 584 0 DC .

SFX 585 N 1
SFX 585 0 dCodeFunction .

SFX 586 N 1
SFX 586 0 dContexts .

SFX 587 N 1
SFX 587 0 DCT .

SFX 588 N 1
SFX 588 0 DCTFilter .

SFX 589 N 1
SFX 589 0 DCTMatrix .

SFX 590 N 1
SFX 590 0 dData .

SFX 591 N 1
SFX 591 0 dDistribution .

SFX 592 N 1
SFX 592 0 decachoron .

SFX 593 N 1
SFX 593 0 decagon .

SFX 594 N 1
SFX 594 0 decenoic .

SFX 595 N 1
SFX 595 0 Decode .

SFX 596 N 1
SFX 596 0 decomposable .

SFX 597 N 1
SFX 597 0 Decompose .

SFX 598 N 1
SFX 598 0 Decomposition .

SFX 599 N 1
SFX 599 0 Deep .

SFX 600 N 1
SFX 600 0 DefaultElement .

SFX 601 N 1
SFX 601 0 DefiniteMatrixQ .

SFX 602 N 1
SFX 602 0 Definition .

SFX 603 N 1
SFX 603 0 Definitions .

SFX 604 N 1
SFX 604 0 Degree .

SFX 605 N 1
SFX 605 0 DegreeConnectivity .

SFX 606 N 1
SFX 606 0 Delay .

SFX 607 N 1
SFX 607 0 Delayed .

SFX 608 N 1
SFX 608 0 Delete .

SFX 609 N 1
SFX 609 0 Delimiters .

SFX 610 N 1
SFX 610 0 Delta .

SFX 611 N 1
SFX 611 0 Denominator .

SFX 612 N 1
SFX 612 0 Density .

SFX 613 N 1
SFX 613 0 Deploy .

SFX 614 N 1
SFX 614 0 Depth .

SFX 615 N 1
SFX 615 0 DerivativeFilter .

SFX 616 N 1
SFX 616 0 dEuclideanDistance .

SFX 617 N 1
SFX 617 0 Deviation .

SFX 618 N 1
SFX 618 0 Devices .

SFX 619 N 1
SFX 619 0 dFraction .

SFX 620 N 1
SFX 620 0 dFractionForm .

SFX 621 N 1
SFX 621 0 dFractionK .

SFX 622 N 1
SFX 622 0 dFunction .

SFX 623 N 1
SFX 623 0 dFunctionQ .

SFX 624 N 1
SFX 624 0 dheim .

SFX 625 N 1
SFX 625 0 di .

SFX 626 N 1
SFX 626 0 Diacritics .

SFX 627 N 1
SFX 627 0 Diagram .

SFX 628 N 1
SFX 628 0 DiagramCoordinates .

SFX 629 N 1
SFX 629 0 Dialog .

SFX 630 N 1
SFX 630 0 DialogInput .

SFX 631 N 1
SFX 631 0 DialogPacket .

SFX 632 N 1
SFX 632 0 Diameter .

SFX 633 N 1
SFX 633 0 Difference .

SFX 634 N 1
SFX 634 0 DifferenceCI .

SFX 635 N 1
SFX 635 0 Differences .

SFX 636 N 1
SFX 636 0 DifferenceTest .

SFX 637 N 1
SFX 637 0 digital .

SFX 638 N 1
SFX 638 0 Digits .

SFX 639 N 1
SFX 639 0 Dimension .

SFX 640 N 1
SFX 640 0 Dimensions .

SFX 641 N 1
SFX 641 0 Dingbat .

SFX 642 N 1
SFX 642 0 DiracDelta .

SFX 643 N 1
SFX 643 0 DirectDisplay .

SFX 644 N 1
SFX 644 0 Direction .

SFX 645 N 1
SFX 645 0 Directory .

SFX 646 N 1
SFX 646 0 DirectoryAdd .
