Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/TechTerms.dic
Active/455,456,1376,1841,1843,2137
Append/439,479,1454,1979,2246
Arnol/625
Array/490,614,992,1003,1583,1774,1816,1869,1934,1936,1989,1994
Ask/215,498,653,792,797,1053
Atom/530,546,628,1215,1216,1256,1510,1869
Begin/631,1049,1771
BestFit/471,1786,1787
Button/309,352,363,395,512,578,926,936,1029,1053,1546,1589,1598,1678,1679,2094,2137,2139
CDF/613,1302
Character/468,551,821,822,1373,1374,1624,1890,1994,2159
Compile/570,585,622,1973
Compose/623,1510,2037
Continue/619,620,621
Date/351,570,609,633,696,1013,1053,1176,1510,1514,1515,1517,1528,1690,1691,1768,1798,1818,1890,1914,2132,2227,2324,2377
Day/546,547,1166,1498,1555,1624,1662,1711,1818,1890,1978,2003,2107
Dirac/480,610
Distribute/570,586,603
Dot/577,849
DropNonNumeric/478
Encode/590
Entity/454,457,532,1053,1121,1328,1510,1846,1861,1862,1863,1921,2128,2129,2293,2306,2324
Equal/479,1979,2230,2246,2332
fanega/572,576,1994
Fit/155,562,1923,1937,2180,2243,2408
Fourier/470,536,539,540,541,587,588,589,690,691,945,946,1041,1558,1767,1786
FourierSinSeries/470
Generic/569
Gray/468,1484
gros/441
Head/414,491,872,1478,1994,2006,2050,2370
HSB/474
Hyperlink/553
IndependentUnit/639
Information/578,579
Inline/548,549,1989
Integer/525,638,938,1056,1478,1624,1789,1791,1869,1874,1947,1994,2132
Key/472,486,687,688,934,1037,1339,1544,1577
Levi/453,1623
Longest/482,483,484,485,515,1292,1553,1739
Mathieu/382,432,433,434,552,1130,1131,1132,1133,1134,1995,2110
Median/617,992,1588
Mellin/527,2274
Merge/635,1535
Message/629,1510,1624,1690,1734,1773,1848,1994,2089
Missing/322,580,581,1869,2132,2137,2325
myria/169,170,174,206,338,339,377,380,384,385,495,496,544,545,573,574,963,964,965,966,1085,1091,1092,1167,1168,1169,1170,1171,1401,1402,1417,1418,1518,1520,1531,1532,1533,1586,1587,1654,1656,1793,1794,1879,1880,1994,2017,2018,2067,2197,2198,2347,2348,2349,2350,2355,2356,2358,2359,2363,2364,2393,2394
Newton/542,543
Next/395,492,582,1427,1790,1803,1850,2009
NFourierExpSeries/470
Nor/624,692,693
Numerator/611
Paclet/440,646,647,648,818,995,996,1302,1326,1327,1541,1542,1652,1939,1940
Path/494,1095,1101
PID/578,615
Planck/504,505,1552,1885
Polyhedron/193,530,578,598,1074
Positive/601,1331,1902,1911,2030
Previous/395,582
PS/643
Punctuation/429
QR/598,2118
quadri/381,534,556,1007,1522,1672,1812
Rectangle/352,437,438
Rhin/570
RSolve/506,2324
Rule/493,607,1012,1816,1991
Rydberg/504,1994
Semialgebraic/489,490
Short/583,676,883,886,887,888,889,1188,1469,1492,1615,1964,2233,2234,2260,2309
Sierpinski/563,1583
Simplify/642,649,865,1426,2304
SkyBlue/599,1497
SlateBlue/575,1497,1573
Small/449,858,1850,2122
Socket/501,1512,1513,1690,1733,1908,1909,1994,2352,2353
Space/564
Splice/591
Square/616
Star/464,578,1095,1299,1445,2166,2202,2242,2244,2253,2254,2269,2285
String/367,379,388,511,525,546,608,687,832,943,949,1012,1013,1037,1323,1399,1478,1555,1776,1777,1789,1790,1830,1869,1928,1930,1931,1932,1947,1962,1974,1975,2080,2106,2120,2162,2184,2248,2267,2283
Sum/523,869
Symmetric/633,1121,1420,1563,1829,1869,1914
System/430,630
Texture/529,531
Time/507,508,644,1013,1083
TimeZone/525,1701
Top/645
Transparent/474
Triangle/414,509,1298,1571,2360
UpSet/607
Value/352,363,640,1012,1849,1869,1994,2012
Variance/447,856,885,1064,1301,1597,1705,1901,1904,2199
Verbose/526
Voronoi/627,1583
Wigner/571,2029
Word/348,429,462,546,551,578,602,1040,1042,1510,1650,1743,2014,2023,2033,2099,2123,2277
Wynn/604
xenna/169,170,174,206,338,339,377,380,384,385,495,496,544,545,573,574,963,964,965,966,1091,1092,1167,1168,1169,1170,1401,1402,1417,1418,1518,1520,1531,1532,1533,1586,1587,1654,1656,1714,1715,1793,1794,1879,1880,1994,2017,2018,2067,2197,2198,2347,2348,2349,2350,2355,2356,2358,2359,2363,2364
xenno/169,170,174,206,384,385,495,496,544,545,573,574,963,964,965,966,1091,1092,1167,1168,1169,1170,1171,1401,1402,1417,1418,1518,1520,1531,1532,1533,1586,1587,1654,1656,1714,1715,1793,1794,1879,1880,1883,1884,1994,2017,2018,2067,2124,2125,2197,2198,2347,2348,2349,2350,2355,2356,2358,2359,2363,2364
$GeoLocation/452,550,1839,2094
$Initialization/514
$System/430,1258,1578,2054,2238,2379
